Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Sexual Assault
§ 6-2-303.
Sexual assault in the second degree.

Any actor who inflicts sexual intrusion on a victim commits sexual assault in the second degree if, under circumstances not constituting sexual assault in the first degree:

The actor causes submission of the victim by threatening to retaliate in the future against the victim or the victim’s spouse, parents, brothers, sisters or children, and the victim reasonably believes the actor will execute this threat. “To retaliate” includes threats of kidnapping, death, serious bodily injury or extreme physical pain;

The actor causes submission of the victim by any means that would prevent resistance by a victim of ordinary resolution;

The actor administers, or knows that someone else administered to the victim, without the prior knowledge or consent of the victim, any substance which substantially impairs the victim’s power to appraise or control his conduct;

The actor knows or should reasonably know that the victim submits erroneously believing the actor to be the victim’s spouse;

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 3.

The actor is in a position of authority over the victim and uses this position of authority to cause the victim to submit;

The actor is an employee, independent contractor or volunteer of a state, county, city or town, or privately operated adult or juvenile correctional system, including but not limited to jails, penal institutions, detention centers, juvenile residential or rehabilitative facilities, adult community correctional facilities or secure treatment facilities and the victim is known or should be known by the actor to be a resident of such facility or under supervision of the correctional system;

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 80, § 3

The actor is an employee or volunteer of an elementary or secondary public or private school who, by virtue of the actor’s employment or volunteer relationship with the school, has interaction with the victim who is a student or participant in the activities of the school and is more than four (4) years older than the victim.

A person is guilty of sexual assault in the second degree if he subjects another person to:

Sexual contact or sexual intrusion in the person’s capacity as a health care provider in the course of providing care, treatment, services or procedures to maintain, diagnose or otherwise treat a patient’s physical or mental condition;

Sexual contact and causes serious bodily injury to the victim under any of the circumstances listed in W.S. 6-2-302(a)(i) through (iv) or paragraphs (a)(i) through (vii) and (ix) of this section.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 135, § 2.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1997, ch. 135, § 2; 2007, ch. 7, § 1; ch. 159, § 3; 2014 ch. 117, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 199, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 80, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to sexual battery, see §

6-2-313

.

The 2007 amendments.

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, in (a), added (vii) and redesignated former (vii) as (viii), substituted “(vii)” for “(vi)” in (b); and made a related change.

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 159, § 3, effective July 1, 2007, in (a), repealed former (a)(v), which read: “At the time of the commission of the act the victim is less than twelve (12) years of age and the actor is at least four (4) years older than the victim.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(vii), deleted “or
work release facilities” and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017,
added (a)(ix); in (b) added “and (ix)” preceding “of
this section,” and made related changes.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018
amendment, by ch. 80, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, in (b), redesignated
former ending text as (b)(ii); added (b)(i); and made a stylistic
change.

The second
2018 amendment, by ch. 80, § 3, effective July 1, 2018, repealed
former (a)(viii), which read: “The actor inflicts sexual intrusion
in treatment or examination of a victim for purposes or in a manner
substantially inconsistent with reasonable medical practices; or.”

Constitutionality.—

Defendant’s conviction for sexual contact with a resident of a correctional facility did not violate her due process rights under either the state or federal constitutions because the statutes at issue clearly proscribed her conduct, the State had an undeniable interest in ensuring the relationship of state prisoners and the state officers who supervised their confinement was not undermined by sexual contact, consensual or otherwise, and, although defendant raised the Wyoming constitutional argument below and on appeal, her argument largely echoed her argument under the federal constitution and she provided no analysis of any of the requisite factors or legal reasons justifying resort to independent state grounds. Sheesley v. State, 2019 WY 32, 437 P.3d 830,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2019).

Guilty plea. —

Defendant's
plea was entered knowingly and voluntarily because defendant had sufficient
information to understand the nature of the charge against him; defendant
was present at the hearing on his motion for a bill of particulars,
at which the State clarified it would be charging him with sexual
assault, and at the plea hearing, defendant asserted that he discussed
his plea with counsel and was satisfied with the advice his was given.
Williams v. State, 2015 WY 100, 354 P.3d 954,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2015), reh'g denied,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. Aug. 26, 2015).

District court
failed to establish a factual basis for the third-degree sexual assault
charge prior to accepting defendant's guilty plea because none of
the facts supported the element of causes submission of the victim
by any means that would prevent resistance by a victim of ordinary
resolution; defendant provided no facts showing that he took any action
that would have prevented a victim of ordinary resolution from resisting. Williams v. State, 2015 WY 100, 354 P.3d 954,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2015), reh'g denied,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. Aug. 26, 2015).

Although the
district court failed to establish a factual basis for the third-degree
sexual assault charge prior to accepting defendant's guilty plea,
there was no plain error because the record revealed sufficient support
for the plea, and defendant was not materially prejudiced by the district
court's failure to establish a sufficient factual basis at the plea
hearing; there were sufficient facts in the record to support the
elements of third-degree sexual assault. Williams v. State, 2015 WY 100, 354 P.3d 954,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2015), reh'g denied,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. Aug. 26, 2015).

Position of authority. —

Defendant could not claim on appeal that the crime of second degree sexual assault by a person in a position of authority did not apply to a psychologist because defendant’s no contest plea waived this non-jurisdictional issue, as (1) defendant could have raised the issue in the trial court in a motion to dismiss or argued the issue to a jury, and (2) neither the underlying legal or factual issues barred the State from charging defendant. Popkin v. State, 2018 WY 121, 429 P.3d 53,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2018).

Sufficient evidence demonstrated that defendant was in a “position of authority” as to a victim because defendant's massage therapist-client relationship with the victim contained the required power differential. Solis v. State, 2013 WY 152, 315 P.3d 622,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2013).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant, an OB/GYN, of second-degree sexual assault of two patients based on his position of authority because medical providers could hold a position of authority based on the type of relationship they had with their patients; and an OB/GYN held a position of authority over a patient. Harnetty v. State, 2019 WY 21, 435 P.3d 368,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2019).

Double jeopardy. —

When defendant was convicted under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-303(a)(vi) and (viii), one of the convictions had to be vacated because (1) the convictions resulted from disjunctive charges under the same statute and were based on a single criminal act, so (2) the legislature presumably intended only one conviction. Solis v. State, 2013 WY 152, 315 P.3d 622,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2013).

Subsection (a)(vi) is neither unreasonable nor arbitrary,

and is within the police power of the state to enact laws for the general welfare of the people. Scadden v. State, 732 P.2d 1036,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 393

(Wyo. 1987).

“Position of authority.” —

“Authority” is defined as: jurisdiction, legal power, legitimacy, prerogative, right to adjudicate, right to command, right to determine, right to settle issues, and rightful power. “Authority” is also defined as: permission; right to exercise powers; to implement and enforce laws; to exact obedience; to command; to judge; control over; and jurisdiction.
Faubion v. State, 2010 WY 79, 233 P.3d 926,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2010).

Defendant's convictions for third-degree sexual assault pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-303(a)(vi) were supported by the evidence because the State proved that defendant, a certified nursing assistant, stood in a “position of authority” with respect to the victim, as contemplated by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-301(a)(iv); the victim, a man who suffered from a progressive muscle-weakening disease, sought and needed specific nursing services.
Baldes v. State, 2012 WY 67, 267 P.3d 386,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(May 15, 2012).

Victim's stepfather in “position of authority.” —

Where the defendant's role as a stepfather gave him both access and influence over the victim, the jury properly found, under the standard of beyond a reasonable doubt, that he invoked his “position of authority” to commit sexual assault against the victim. Brown v. State, 817 P.2d 429,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1991).

Defendant's status as the stepfather of the 17-year-old victim and as a household member satisfied the statutory definition of “position of authority” required for conviction under this section. Blake v. State, 933 P.2d 474,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1997).

Teacher or coach deemed “authority.” —

The legislature used the word “authority” in subsection (a)(vi) to mean an externally granted power, not a self-generated control. A teacher or coach, for example, is vested with such power by a grant from society. Scadden v. State, 732 P.2d 1036,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 393

(Wyo. 1987).

Chiropractor in “position of authority.” —

Where patients testified that they were victims of a chiropractor who touched their breasts and pubic areas and made inappropriate remarks during chiropractic treatment, the Supreme Court of Wyoming held that defendant's conduct was third degree sexual assault because he was in a “position of authority” over his patients for purposes of this section. While not engaged in the practice of medicine, chiropractors govern themselves by ethical codes advising practitioners not to take physical advantage of any patient; therefore, the sexual contact that defendant had with his patients was prohibited.
Faubion v. State, 2010 WY 79, 233 P.3d 926,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2010).

Child witness. —

Defendant's conviction of second-degree sexual assault, third degree sexual assault, and indecent liberties with a minor was upheld where the trial court held a hearing to determine the competency of the five-year old child victim to testify as to the sexual assault; no separate taint hearing was required because defendant did not come forward with some evidence that taint was present, and the competency inquiry, the five-part test to determine the competency of child witnesses, included the question of pretrial taint. Morganflash v. State, 2003 WY 120, 76 P.3d 830,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2003).

Establishing exact date of child abuse unnecessary. —

In the case of sexual abuse of a child, it is sufficient to establish the transaction rather than the exact date or dates in question. Brown v. State, 817 P.2d 429,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1991).

Double jeopardy.—

After defendant was acquitted of first- and second-degree sexual assault, and a jury hung as to third-degree sexual assault, a retrial on third-degree sexual assault did not violate double jeopardy because a bill of particulars included conduct other than cunnilingus for which defendant was acquitted, which the crime excluded. Cercy v. State, 2019 WY 131, 455 P.3d 678,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2019).

Physician who inflicts sexual intrusion may be charged years after events occur. —

Physician who inflicted sexual intrusion during pelvic examinations was found guilty of forcible rape of two patients under former § 6-63, W.S. 1957, assault and battery with intent to rape two patients under former § 6-64, W.S. 1957, and second-degree sexual assault on another patient under former § 6-4-303(a)(vii). Though the period of time between the occurrence of the incidents and the charges ranged from 20 months to 17 years, Wyoming has no statute of limitations for any criminal case; the delay in criminal charges was not attributable to the state of Wyoming; there was no indication of bad faith; there was no evidence of specific prejudice; and, as a matter of law, there was no denial of due process or a fair trial. Story v. State, 721 P.2d 1020,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 577

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 479 U.S. 962, 107 S. Ct. 459, 93 L. Ed. 2d 405, 1986 U.S. LEXIS 4771 (U.S. 1986).

Defendant's conviction of sexually assaulting daughters not barred under §

6-4-402

(incest). —

This section and §§

6-4-402

(incest) and

14-3-105

(taking indecent liberties with a minor) all concern sexual activities, but one cannot be said to be more specific than the others. Therefore, the defendant's convictions under this section and former §

14-3-105

were not barred under §

6-4-402

, even though the victims of his acts were his daughters, ages four and six years. Kallas v. State, 704 P.2d 693,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 525

(Wyo. 1985).

Incest does not merge into sexual assault. —

The incest statute requires that the sexual contact or intrusion be committed upon a relative of the accused. This family relationship element prevents the incest conviction from merging into the second-degree sexual assault conviction since a family relationship was not a necessary element for the sexual assault. Owen v. State, 902 P.2d 190,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1995), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

For purposes of sentencing incest charges merged into the sexual assault because all sexual assault charges required either sexual intrusion or sexual contact, and so did the incest charges. In short, it would be impossible for defendant to commit second- or third-degree sexual assault based upon the use of his position of authority as father of the victims without also committing incest.
Najera v. State, 2009 WY 105, 214 P.3d 990,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2009), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

Separate sexual acts. —

Where defendant performed fellatio upon the victim and then made the victim reciprocate, two distinct acts of fellatio were committed and two separate sentences proper. Baum v. State, 745 P.2d 877,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 534

(Wyo. 1987).

Defendant, who attempted sexual intrusion without success, properly charged with attempted second-degree assault. —

Fourth-degree sexual assault may be committed in numerous ways without committing sexual intrusion, required by subsection (a). Because there is no statute specifically making attempted sexual intrusion a crime, the general attempt statute applies, and the defendant, who attempted sexual intrusion without success, was properly charged with attempted second-degree sexual assault. Bueno-Hernandez v. State, 724 P.2d 1132,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 612

(Wyo. 1986), cert. denied, 480 U.S. 907, 107 S. Ct. 1353, 94 L. Ed. 2d 523, 1987 U.S. LEXIS 1004 (U.S. 1987).

It was within the prosecutor's discretion to charge attempted second-degree sexual assault, instead of taking indecent liberties with a minor. Bueno-Hernandez v. State, 724 P.2d 1132,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 612

(Wyo. 1986), cert. denied, 480 U.S. 907, 107 S. Ct. 1353, 94 L. Ed. 2d 523, 1987 U.S. LEXIS 1004 (U.S. 1987).

Immodest liberties not lesser included offense of sexual assault. —

Jury instruction that taking of immodest, immoral or indecent liberties with a child (former §

14-3-105

) was a lesser included offense under this section was reversible error. Derksen v. State, 845 P.2d 1383,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1993).

Merger of sexual assault offense and indecent liberties offense. —

For purposes of sentencing, a merger of a sexual assault offense and an indecent liberties offense may occur when the facts which have been proven at trial establish that the defendant committed only one criminal act. Owen v. State, 902 P.2d 190,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1995), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

Second-degree sexual assault is not lesser included offense of first-degree sexual assault. —

The elements found in second-degree sexual assault of causing submission of the victim by threatening to retaliate by being in a position of authority over the victim and using this position of authority to cause the victim to submit require elements different from those found in first-degree sexual assault. Jackson v. State, 891 P.2d 70,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1995).

Attempted first-degree sexual assault and attempted second-degree sexual assault mutually exclusive. —

A person cannot commit both attempted first-degree sexual assault and attempted second-degree sexual assault in the same criminal incident; these crimes are mutually exclusive. Harris v. State, 933 P.2d 1114,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1997).

Jury instructions. —

District court properly, upon a jury verdict, convicted defendant, a former corrections employee, of second-degree sexual assault because defendant did not show that she was prejudiced by any alleged failure by the district court to provide a voluntariness instruction to the jury, the district court’s failure to instruct the jury on voluntariness did not violate a clear and unequivocal rule of law, defendant did not claim, and the evidence did not suggest, her actions were not voluntary, and while she provided excuses for her actions, she nevertheless admitted that they were “consensual.” Wyant v. State, 2020 WY 15, 458 P.3d 13,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 14

.

In instructing the jury, the trial court did not err by combining the attempt elements with the second-degree sexual assault elements; the instruction clearly set out all of the elements that the jury needed to find in order to convict. Rigler v. State, 941 P.2d 734,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1997).

In a second-degree sexual assault based on a position of authority case, defendant’s proposed jury instruction was not a proper theory of defense instruction, and the district court did not err when it rejected the instruction because, instead, it was a request that the State prove an element that was not included within the position of authority subsection charged; and defendant did not have a due process right to have the court instruct the jury on a crime for which he was not charged under and was not otherwise a lesser-included offense. Harnetty v. State, 2019 WY 21, 435 P.3d 368,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2019).

Lesser-included offense instructions not required. —

The manner of committing sexual assault in the second degree and sexual assault in the third degree not only is differentiated under the statutory language, but obviously these offenses can be committed by acts or conduct different from that proscribed by the statute forbidding sexual assault in the first degree. Because of this, every element of the claimed lesser included offenses of sexual assault in the second degree and sexual assault in the third degree was not necessarily encompassed within the commission of the greater offense of sexual assault in the first degree, and the lesser included offense instructions were not required. Also, with respect to the claimed lesser included offense of sexual assault in the third degree, the evidence justified a conclusion of penetration or nothing and an instruction relating to “sexual contact” would not have been appropriate. Seeley v. State, 715 P.2d 232,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 503

(Wyo. 1986).

In a case involving second-degree sexual assault under this section, a trial court did not err by denying a request for lesser-included jury instructions for third-degree sexual assault or sexual battery under the circumstances of the case due to the fact that different elements were required.
Heywood v. State, 2007 WY 149, 170 P.3d 1227,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2007).

Court did not abuse its discretion in allowing five-year-old victim

to testify in trial for second degree sexual assault. Baum v. State, 745 P.2d 877,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 534

(Wyo. 1987).

Corroboration of defendant's confession. —

Testimony and statements of child victims of sexual abuse establishing that sexual contact occurred between children and defendant sufficiently corroborated defendant's confession. Simmers v. State, 943 P.2d 1189,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1997).

Evidence sufficient for conviction. —

The court could not hold that the evidence was insufficient to support a guilty finding. See Baum v. State, 745 P.2d 877,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 534

(Wyo. 1987).

Where the testimony of the victim was sufficient to establish the element of sexual intrusion with respect to the charge against the defendant, and where the circumstances surrounding the lifestyle in the house justified the finding that the victim's submission was the product of means that would have prevented resistance in a person of ordinary resolution, the evidence was sufficient to sustain the defendant's conviction. Kavanaugh v. State, 769 P.2d 908,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 1989).

There was sufficient evidence to convict defendant of both second degree sexual assault and indecent liberties, and defendant failed to demonstrate how the district court abused its discretion during his trial in admitting expert testimony and prior bad acts evidence. Griswold v. State, 994 P.2d 920,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1999).

In defendant's trial for sexual assault and incest, evidence was sufficient to sustain the convictions, pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-303

and Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-4-402(a), because it was uncontested that defendant, as the victims'
father, occupied a position of authority over the victims, and defendant committed the sexual acts.
Najera v. State, 2009 WY 105, 214 P.3d 990,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2009), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

Applied

in

Elliott v. State, 600 P.2d 1044,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 460

(Wyo. 1979); Young v. State, 678 P.2d 880,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 272

(Wyo. 1984); Watters v. State, 2004 WY 155, 101 P.3d 908,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(2004).

Quoted

in

Sanchez v. State, 592 P.2d 1130,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1979); Connolly v. State, 610 P.2d 1008,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1980); Sears v. State, 632 P.2d 946,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1981); In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984); McGinn v. State, 928 P.2d 1157,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1996); Misenheimer v. State, 2001 WY 65, 27 P.3d 273,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2001); DeLoge v. State, 2002 WY 155, 55 P.3d 1233,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2002); Large v. State, 2008 WY 22, 177 P.3d 807,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Feb. 28, 2008); Garza v. State, 2010 WY 64, 231 P.3d 884,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(May 19, 2010).

Stated

in

State v. District Court, 715 P.2d 191,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 501

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Weddle v. State, 621 P.2d 231,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 327

(Wyo. 1980); Betzle v. State, 847 P.2d 1010,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1993); Mehring v. State, 860 P.2d 1101,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1993); Brown v. State, 894 P.2d 597,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1995); Curl v. State, 898 P.2d 369,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1995); Jibben v. State, 901 P.2d 1099,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1995); Vernier v. State, 909 P.2d 1344,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1996); BW v. State, 12 P.3d 675,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 2000); Chapman v. State, 2001 WY 25, 18 P.3d 1164,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2001); BW v. State, 12 P.3d 675,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 2000); McCard v. State, 2003 WY 142, 78 P.3d 1040,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2003); Hirsch v. State, 2006 WY 66, 135 P.3d 586,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. May 31, 2006); Jackson v. State, 2012 WY 56, 273 P.3d 1105,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Apr. 11, 2012).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Use of Videotaping to Avoid Traumatization of Child Sexual Abuse Victim-Witnesses,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 565 (1986).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of statute defining crime of rape to include activity traditionally punishable as sodomy or the like, 3 ALR4th 1009.

Running of limitations against action for civil damages for sexual abuse of child, 9 ALR5th 321.

Statute protecting minors in a specified age range from rape or other sexual activity as applicable to defendant minor within protected age group, 18 ALR5th 856.

Mistake or lack of information as to victim's age as defense to statutory rape, 46 ALR5th 499.